California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) Section 32(c)(2)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.

(5) Section 32(c)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 place of abode, is modified by substituting “this state” for “the United States.”

(d) Section 32(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “$3,400” for the amount prescribed in that provision.

(e) (1) In lieu of Section 32(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inflation adjustments, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, the amounts specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and in subdivision (d) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, when recomputing the amounts referenced
 in paragraph (1), the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index shall be deemed to be the greater of 3.1 percent or the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index as calculated under subdivision (h) of Section 17041 for that taxable year.

(3) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, and before January 1, 2020, when recomputing the amounts referenced in paragraph (1), the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index shall be deemed to be the greater of 3.5 percent or the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index as calculated under subdivision (h) of Section 17041 for that taxable year.

(f) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the
 taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the taxpayer.

(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or
 improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.

(B) The adoption of any regulations pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, these emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State, and shall remain
 in effect until revised or repealed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or amounts of those benefits.

(i) (1) For the purpose of implementing the credit allowed by this section for the 2015 taxable year, the Franchise Tax Board shall be exempt from the following:

(A) Special Project Report requirements under State Administrative Manual Sections 4819.36, 4945, and 4945.2.

(B) Special Project Report requirements under Statewide Information Management Manual Section 30.

(C) Section 11.00 of the 2015 Budget Act.

(D) Sections 12101, 12101.5, 12102, and 12102.1 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall formally incorporate the scope, costs, and schedule changes associated with the implementation of the credit allowed by this section in its next anticipated Special Project Report for its Enterprise Data to Revenue Project.

(j) (1) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the California Earned Income Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s poorest working
 families and individuals. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:

(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.

(B) The number of individuals represented on tax returns claiming the credit.

(C) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.

(D) The distribution of credits by number of dependents and income ranges. The income ranges shall encompass the phase-in and phaseout ranges of the credit.

(E) Using data from tax returns claiming the credit, including an estimate of the federal
 tax credit determined under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, an estimate of the number of families who are lifted out of deep poverty by the credit and an estimate of the number of families who are lifted out of deep poverty by the combination of the credit and the federal tax credit. For the purposes of this subdivision, a family is in “deep poverty” if the income of the family is less than 50 percent of the federal poverty threshold.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.

(k) The tax credit allowed by this section shall be known as the California Earned Income Tax Credit.

(l) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 722 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(m) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit
 adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:

In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children2.20%1.22%1 qualifying child3.10%2.29%2 qualifying children2.13%3.45%3 or more qualifying children2.12%3.49%

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2018, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no
 qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:

  In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$5,354$5,3541 qualifying child$9,484$9,4842 qualifying children$13,794$13,7943 or more qualifying children$13,875$13,875

(n) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred three dollars ($103) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that
 taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty-eight dollars ($258) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:

In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage
 is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children2.20%1.08%1 qualifying child3.10%2.00%2 qualifying children2.13%2.82%3 or more qualifying children2.12%2.85%

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to
 subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to one hundred three dollars ($103) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to two hundred fifty-eight dollars ($258) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment
 factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:

 In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$5,520$5,5201 qualifying child$9,778$9,7782 qualifying children$14,222$14,2223 or more qualifying children$14,305$14,305

(o) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to two hundred dollars ($200) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less than or equal to five hundred five dollars ($505) multiplied by the ratio of
 the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, and the earned income amount is greater than or equal to the corresponding amount in the table set forth in paragraph (2) below, then in lieu of the table prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the credit percentage and the phaseout percentage shall be determined as follows:

In the case of an eligible individual with:The credit percentage is:The phaseout percentage is:No qualifying children5.43%0.92%1 qualifying child6.33%2.88%2 qualifying children4.20%3.75%3 or more qualifying children4.15%3.78%

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, if the amount of credit computed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) is less than or equal to two hundred dollars ($200) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with no qualifying children, or less
 than or equal to five hundred five dollars ($505) multiplied by the ratio of the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for that taxable year divided by 0.85 for an eligible individual with one or more qualifying children, then in lieu of the table prescribed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the earned income amount and the phaseout amount shall be determined as follows:

In the case of an eligible individual with:The earned income amount is:The phaseout amount is:No qualifying children$4,334$4,3341 qualifying child$9,381$9,3812 qualifying children$14,137$14,1373 or more qualifying children$14,302$14,302

(3) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and until and including the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The amounts in paragraphs (1)
 and (2) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(B) The phaseout percentage for each of the four categories of eligible individuals shall be recalculated by the Franchise Tax Board in such a manner that, for a taxpayer with an earned income of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the calculated amount of credit is equal to zero.

(4) (A) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the amounts in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets
 under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(B) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the phaseout percentages for the prior taxable year, as recalculated under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), shall apply.

(p) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, Section 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to identification numbers, is modified as follows:

(1) By deleting “(other than a social security number issued pursuant to clause (II) (or that portion of clause (III) that relates to clause (II)) of section 205(c)(2)(B)(i) of the Social
 Security Act).”

(2) By substituting “federal individual taxpayer identification number or a social security number” for “social security number.”

(q) An eligible individual, eligible individual’s spouse, or qualifying child using a federal individual taxpayer identification number as authorized under subdivision (p) shall:

(1) Upon request of the Franchise Tax Board, provide:

(A) Identifying documents acceptable for purposes of obtaining a California driver’s license or identification card as authorized by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code and related regulations adopted for purposes of establishing documents acceptable to
 prove identity.

(B) Identifying documents used to report earned income for the taxable year.

(2) Upon receiving a valid social security number issued to that individual by the Social Security Administration, notify the Franchise Tax Board, in the time and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(r) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 2.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.1.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2019, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, a young child tax credit to a qualified taxpayer, in an amount as determined under paragraph (2).

(2) (A) (i) The amount of the young child tax credit shall be equal to one thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($1,176), multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable year as specified for in Section 17052.

(ii) The amount of the young child tax credit specified under clause (i) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax
 brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(B) The young child tax credit allowable in any taxable year to any qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the maximum amount specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) as recomputed under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(C) (i) The young child tax credit shall be reduced by twenty dollars ($20) for each one hundred dollars ($100), or fraction thereof, by which the qualified taxpayer’s earned income, as defined in Section 17052, exceeds the “threshold amount.” For purposes of this section, the “threshold amount” shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(ii) (I) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i) shall be recomputed annually
 in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041, except that the resulting products shall be rounded off to the nearest cent.

(II) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, and before January 1, 2024, the amount calculated under subclause (I) shall substitute for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).

(III) The Franchise Tax Board shall calculate a graduated reduction amount in such a manner that, for a qualified taxpayer with earned income of one dollar ($1) or more in excess of the maximum earned income that results in a credit amount greater than zero dollars ($0) pursuant to Section 17052, the amount of the credit under this section is equal to zero. For taxable
 years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the graduated reduction amount calculated pursuant to this subclause shall be substituted for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).

(iii) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the “threshold amount” in this subparagraph shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(D) The young child tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the credit allowed under Section 17052.

(b) (1) “Qualified taxpayer” means an eligible individual who has at least one qualifying child and who satisfies either of the following:

(A) Has been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052.

(B) Meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Would otherwise have been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052, but has earned income, as defined in Section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 17052, of zero dollars ($0) or less.

(ii) Does not have net losses in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in the taxable year.

(iii) Does not have wages, salaries, tips, and other employee compensation in excess of thirty thousand
 dollars ($30,000) in the taxable year.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the amounts specified under clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (B) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(c) “Qualifying child” shall have the same meaning as under Section 17052, except that the child shall be younger than six years of age as of the last day of the taxable year.

(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise
 Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.

(B) The adoption of any regulations pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code,
 these emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State, and shall remain in effect until revised or repealed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code or amounts of those benefits.

(g) (1) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the Young Child Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s poorest working families and young children. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:

(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.

(B) The number of qualifying children represented on tax returns claiming the credit.

(C) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly
 Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 179.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.6.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount determined in accordance with Section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expense for household and dependent care services necessary for gainful employment, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) The amount of the credit shall be a percentage, as provided in subdivision (b) of the allowable federal credit without taking into account whether there is a federal tax liability.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), the percentage of the allowable federal credit shall be determined as follows:

(1) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003: 
If the adjusted gross income is:The percentage of
credit is:$40,000 or less63%Over $40,000 but not over $70,00053%Over $70,000 but not over $100,00042%Over $100,000 0%(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2003: 
If the adjusted gross income is:The percentage of
credit is:$40,000 or less50%Over
 $40,000 but not over $70,00043%Over $70,000 but not over $100,00034%Over $100,000 0%(c) For purposes of this section, “adjusted gross income” means adjusted gross income as computed for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of
 Section 17024.5.

(d) The credit authorized by this section shall be limited, as follows:

(1) Employment-related expenses, within the meaning of Section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be limited to expenses for household services and care provided in this state.

(2) Earned income, within the meaning of Section 21(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be limited to earned income subject to tax under this part. For purposes of this paragraph, compensation received by a member of the armed forces for active services as a member of the armed forces, other than pensions or retired pay, shall be considered earned income subject to tax under this part, whether or not the member is domiciled in this state.

(e) For purposes of this section, Section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to a qualifying individual, is modified to additionally provide that a child, as defined in Section 152(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be treated, for purposes of Section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for purposes of this section, as receiving over one-half of their support during the calendar year from the parent having custody for a greater portion of the calendar year, that parent shall be treated as a “custodial parent,” within the meaning of Section 152(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for purposes of this section, and the child shall be treated as a qualifying individual under Section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for purposes of this section, if both of the following apply:

(1) The child receives over one-half of their support during the calendar year from their parents who never married each other and who lived apart at all times during the last six months of the calendar year.

(2) The child is in the custody of one or both of their parents for more than one-half of the calendar year.

(f) Section 21(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for 2021, as added by Section 9631(a) of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.10.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the qualified amount.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Electing qualified entity” means a qualified entity, as defined by Section 19902, that has elected to pay the elective tax under Part 10.4 (commencing with Section 19900).

(2) “Qualified amount” means an amount equal to 9.3 percent of the sum of the qualified taxpayer’s guaranteed payments as defined by Section 707(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating
 to guaranteed payments, and the qualified taxpayer’s pro rata share or distributive share, as applicable, of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in qualified net income, as defined in Section 19900, subject to the election made by an electing qualified entity under Part 10.4 (commencing with Section 19900).

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means:

(A) A taxpayer, as defined in Section 17004, excluding partnerships, that is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity that consented to have the sum of their guaranteed payments and pro rata share or distributive share of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in the qualified net income, as defined in Section 19900, of the electing qualified entity.

(B) “Qualified taxpayer” does not include a business entity that is disregarded for federal tax purposes, as described in Section 23038, or its partners or members.

(C) Subparagraph (B) shall not apply to a limited liability company that is disregarded for federal tax purposes, as described in Section 23038, and meets both of the following:

(i) Is owned by a taxpayer, as defined in Section 17004, excluding partnerships, that consented to have the sum of their guaranteed payments and pro rata share or distributive share of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in the qualified net income, as defined in Section 19900, of the electing qualified entity.

(ii) Is a partner,
 shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity.

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding four years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a qualified taxpayer that is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity that makes the election under Section 19900 for their taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026, and files its return on a fiscal year basis pursuant to Section 18566, shall be allowed the credit pursuant to this section in the qualified taxpayer’s taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027.

(e) (1) Any disallowance of a credit under this section due to any of the following conditions shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return:

(A) Timely payment was not made under subdivision (b) of Section 19904.

(B) Payments made for the taxable year exceed the elective tax computed under Part 10.4 (commencing with Section 19900).

(C) No election was made or allowed under Part 10.4 (commencing with Section 19900).

(2) Any amount of tax resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(f) (1) For each taxable year the credit is allowed, for purposes of Sections 18001 and 18002, “‘net tax’ (as defined by Section 17039) payable under this part” shall be increased by the amount of credit under this section that reduced the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in that taxable year.

(2) This subdivision shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027.

(3) Section 41 shall not apply to the expansion of existing tax expenditures resulting from application of this subdivision.

(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(h) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares that the goal of this tax credit is to provide tax relief to small businesses facing unprecedented economic hurdles due to COVID-19.

(i) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2022 shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2027.

(j) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027. 

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 7.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.11.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the qualified amount.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Electing qualified entity” means a qualified entity, as defined by Section 19912, that has elected to pay the elective tax under Part 10.4.1 (commencing with Section 19910).

(2) (A) “Qualified amount” means an amount equal to 9.3 percent of the sum of the qualified taxpayer’s guaranteed payments as defined by Section 707(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to guaranteed payments, and the qualified taxpayer’s pro rata share or distributive share, as applicable, of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in qualified net income, as defined in Section 19910, subject to the election made by an electing qualified entity under Part 10.4.1 (commencing with Section 19910).

(B) In the case of a qualified taxpayer who is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity that does not make the payment required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19914, or makes a
 payment that is less than the amount due pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19914, “qualified amount” means an amount equal to the amount described in subparagraph (A), reduced by an amount equal to 12.5 percent of the qualified taxpayer’s pro rata share of the amount due but not paid under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19914.

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means:

(A) A taxpayer, as defined in Section 17004, excluding partnerships, that is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity that consented to have the sum of their guaranteed payments and pro rata share or distributive share of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in the qualified net income, as defined in Section 19910, of
 the electing qualified entity.

(B) “Qualified taxpayer” does not include a business entity that is disregarded for federal tax purposes, as described in Section 23038, or its partners or members.

(C) Subparagraph (B) shall not apply to a limited liability company that is disregarded for federal tax purposes, as described in Section 23038, and meets both of the following:

(i) Is owned by a taxpayer, as defined in Section 17004, excluding partnerships, that consented to have the sum of their guaranteed payments and pro rata share or distributive share of income, as determined under this part and Part 11 (commencing with
 Section 23001), subject to tax under this part included in the qualified net income, as defined in Section 19910, of the electing qualified entity.

(ii) Is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity.

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding four years, if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a qualified taxpayer that is a partner, shareholder, or member of an electing qualified entity that makes the election under
 Section 19910 for their taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2030, and before January 1, 2031, and files its return on a fiscal year basis pursuant to Section 18566, shall be allowed the credit pursuant to this section in the qualified taxpayer’s taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2031, and before January 1, 2032.

(e) (1) Any disallowance of a credit under this section due to any of the following conditions shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return:

(A) Timely payment was not made under subdivision (b) of Section 19914.

(B) Payments made for the taxable year exceed the elective tax computed under Part 10.4.1 (commencing
 with Section 19910).

(C) No election was made or allowed under Part 10.4.1 (commencing with Section 19910).

(D) The amount of the credit claimed exceeds the credit amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) Any amount of tax resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(f) For each taxable year the credit is allowed, for purposes of Sections 18001 and 18002, “‘net tax’ (as defined by Section 17039) payable under this part” shall be
 increased by the amount of credit under this section that reduced the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in that taxable year.

(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(h) This section shall only become operative if the operation of Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating
 to the limitation on individual deductions for taxable years 2018 through 2025, is extended.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 8.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.12.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, for the taxable year an amount determined in accordance with Section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit for increasing research activities, except as follows:

(a) For each taxable year beginning before January 1, 1997, the reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal
 Revenue Code is modified to read “8 percent.”

(b) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, and before January 1, 1999, the reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “11 percent.”

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000, the reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “12 percent.”

(3) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the reference to “20 percent” in Section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “15 percent.”

(c) Section 41(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.
